Washington statutes.
RCW 27.53.045

Abandoned archaeological resources—Declaration.

All historic archaeological resources abandoned for thirty years or more in, on, or under the surface of any public lands or waters owned by or under the possession, custody, or control of the state of Washington, including, but not limited to all ships, or aircraft, and any part or the contents thereof, and all treasure trove is hereby declared to be the property of the state of Washington.

[ 1988 c 124 s 3.]

NOTES:

Intent—Application—1988 c 124: See notes following RCW 27.53.030.